Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-214
Election commissioner; enforcement of act; election commissioner or chief deputy election commissioner; removal; grounds; procedure.

The election commissioner shall be responsible for the enforcement of the Election Act as it relates to his or her office and for the competency, integrity, and conduct of his or her chief deputy election commissioner and all personnel appointed by him or her. The election commissioner or chief deputy election commissioner shall be removed when it appears that (1) he or she has been derelict in the performance of the duties of his or her office, (2) he or she is incompetent, (3) his or her conduct is prejudicial to the public interest, (4) he or she has appointed incompetent, negligent, or corrupt precinct or district inspectors, judges of election, clerks of election, or deputy registrars, (5) a fair and impartial registration of voters was not obtained in any district of the county, or (6) the act was not enforced in the county. If the election commissioner is appointed by the Governor, the Governor shall remove the election commissioner or chief deputy election commissioner when either is subject to removal under this section. If the Governor fails to remove the election commissioner or the chief deputy election commissioner when either the election commissioner or deputy, or both, are subject to removal under this section, any citizen of the county may institute an action to order the Governor to remove the election commissioner, chief deputy election commissioner, or both. If the election commissioner is appointed by the county board, the county board shall remove the election commissioner or chief deputy election commissioner when either is subject to removal under this section. If the county board fails to remove the election commissioner or the chief deputy election commissioner when either the election commissioner or deputy, or both, are subject to removal under this section, any citizen of the county may institute an action to order the county board to remove the election commissioner, chief deputy election commissioner, or both.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 34;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 17.

The election commissioner is responsible for the enforcement of the election laws. Rasp v. McHugh, 121 Neb. 380, 237 N.W. 394 (1931).